FST/englishtoy.lexc
!!!english.lexc!!!


Multichar_Symbols +N +V +Adj +Sg +Pl +Prs +3sg +Pst +PstPtcp +PrsPtcp


LEXICON Root

        Noun ;
        Verb ;
        Adj  ;


LEXICON Adj

happy   Adjder;


LEXICON Adjder

+N:^ness  Nder;
+N:^ness  #;


LEXICON Noun

car      Ninfl;
salmon   Ninfl;
pig      Ninfl;
picnic   Ninfl;
box      Ninfl;
church   Ninfl;
goose    Ninfl;
try      Ninfl;
Alamblak Ninfl;


LEXICON Nder

+Adj:^less Adjder;
+Adj:^less #;


LEXICON Ninfl

+N+Sg:0    #;
+N+Pl:^s   #;


LEXICON Verb

try      Vinfl;
swim     Vinfl;
floss    Vinfl;
explode  Vinfl;
move     Vinfl;
give     Vinfl;
have     Vinfl;
go       Vinfl;
walk     Vinfl;
beg      Vinfl;


LEXICON Vinfl

+V+Prs:0         #;
+V+Pst:^ed       #;
+V+Prs+3sg:^s    #;
+V+PstPtcp:^ed   #;
+V+PrsPtcp:^ing  #;
